installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.aff
SFX B   out         uji        [^m]out
SFX B   out         uj         [^m]out
SFX B   out         ujme       [^m]out
SFX B   out         ujte       [^m]out
SFX B   out         ul         [^m]out
SFX B   out         ula        [^m]out
SFX B   out         ulo        [^m]out
SFX B   out         uli        [^m]out
SFX B   out         uly        [^m]out
SFX B   out         u          mout
SFX B   out         es         mout
SFX B   out         e          mout
SFX B   out         eme        mout
SFX B   out         ete        mout
SFX B   t           0          mout
SFX B   out         i          mout
SFX B   out         eme        mout
SFX B   out         ete        mout
SFX B   t           nu         tat
SFX B   t           nes        tat
SFX B   t           ne         tat
SFX B   t           neme       tat
SFX B   t           nete       tat
SFX B   t           nou        tat
SFX B   t           n          tat
SFX B   t           nme        tat
SFX B   t           nte        tat
SFX B   at          im         pat
SFX B   at          is         pat
SFX B   at          i          pat
SFX B   at          ime        pat
SFX B   at          ite        pat
SFX B   at          i          pat
SFX B   at          eme        pat
SFX B   at          ete        pat
SFX B   rat         ru         rat
SFX B   rat         res        rat
SFX B   rat         re         rat
SFX B   rat         reme       rat
SFX B   rat         rete       rat
SFX B   rat         rou        rat
SFX B   rat         r          rat
SFX B   rat         rme        rat
SFX B   rat         rte        rat
SFX B   0           i          [aaee]t
SFX B   t           l          [aaee]t
SFX B   t           la         [aaee]t
SFX B   t           lo         [aaee]t
SFX B   t           li         [aaee]t
SFX B   t           ly         [aaee]t

SFX O Y 55
SFX O   en          na         [os]ten
SFX O   en          no         [os]ten
SFX O   en          ni         [os]ten
SFX O   en          ny         [os]ten
SFX O   en          nu         [os]ten
SFX O   0           a          [^os]ten
SFX O   0           o          [^os]ten
SFX O   0           i          [^os]ten
SFX O   0           y          [^os]ten
SFX O   0           u          [^os]ten
SFX O   en          na         [bcmnpj]en
SFX O   en          no         [bcmnpj]en
SFX O   en          ni         [bcmnpj]en
SFX O   en          ny         [bcmnpj]en
SFX O   en          nu         [bcmnpj]en
SFX O   0           a          [^tbcmnpj]en
SFX O   0           o          [^tbcmnpj]en
SFX O   0           i          [^tbcmnpj]en
SFX O   0           y          [^tbcmnpj]en
SFX O   0           u          [^tbcmnpj]en
SFX O   0           a          [^e]n
SFX O   0           o          [^e]n
SFX O   0           i          [^e]n
SFX O   0           y          [^e]n
SFX O   0           u          [^e]n
SFX O   0           a          [^nlvy]
SFX O   0           o          [^nlvy]
SFX O   0           i          [^nlvyghkr]
SFX O   0           y          [^nlvy]
SFX O   0           u          [^nlvy]
SFX O   k           ci         k
SFX O   r           ri         r
SFX O   0           a          [^e]l
SFX O   0           o          [^e]l
SFX O   0           i          [^e]l
SFX O   0           y          [^e]l
SFX O   0           a          [^s]el
SFX O   0           o          [^s]el
SFX O   0           i          [^s]el
SFX O   0           y          [^s]el
SFX O   el          la         sel
SFX O   el          lo         sel
SFX O   el          li         sel
SFX O   el          ly         sel
SFX O   ev          va         ev
SFX O   ev          vo         ev
SFX O   ev          vi         ev
SFX O   ev          vy         ev
SFX O   ev          vu         ev
SFX O   0           a          [^e]v
SFX O   0           o          [^e]v
SFX O   0           i          [^e]v
SFX O   0           y          [^e]v
SFX O   0           u          [^e]v
SFX O   y           o          y

SFX X Y 19
SFX X   a           ouc        a
SFX X   a           ouce       a
SFX X   e           ic         e
SFX X   e           ice        e
SFX X   e           ic         e
SFX X   e           ice        e
SFX X   0           si         [dv]
SFX X   0           se         [dv]
SFX X   0           si         et
SFX X   0           se         et
SFX X   out         uv         out
SFX X   out         uvsi       out
SFX X   out         uvse       out
SFX X   t           v          [ai]t
SFX X   t           vsi        [ai]t
SFX X   t           vse        [ai]t
SFX X   yt          yv         yt
SFX X   yt          yvsi       yt
SFX X   yt          yvse       yt
