installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.dic
bezpecny/YKRON
bezvzdusny/YKRO
blahoprat/BTN
blativy/YKRON
blit/ON
bohat/ON
boje/XN
bourlivy/YKRON
budu/BN
citen/ON
cit/BN
cit/ON
dban/ON
del/ON
dim/BN
dlouhy/YRON
dobit/ON
doblit/BN
dobrat/ATXN
dobyl/ON
docupu/BN
dohnal/ON
dohneten/ON
dohnit/BN
dohrat/BON
dohudl/ON
dochvet/BN
dojat/ON
dojda/XN
dojedu/BN
dojet/ION
dokapu/BN
doklovu/BN
dokontrolovat/ATXN
dokousu/BN
dolhal/ON
dolit/BN
domelu/BN
domlel/ON
domyslen/ON
donyt/BN
doodeju/BN
dooden/ON
doodepisu/BN
doodepsan/ON
dopet/B
dopisu/BN
dopit/ON
dopleji/BN
doplet/ON
doprat/BTN
dopreden/ON
dopsan/ON
dorazit/ACXN
dorubu/BN
dorcen/ON
dorekl/ON
doreknu/BN
doreknuv/XN
doriznuty/YRON
dosecen/ON
dosecu/BN
dosel/ON
dosil/ON
dosmat/BN
dospet/BN
dostelu/BN
dostlal/ON
dostoupit/ATXN
dostunu/BN
dostupen/ON
doskubu/BN
dotal/ON
dotazi/BN
dotnu/BN
dotra/XN
dotrasl/ON
dotyt/BN
doucil/ON
doudim/BN
dovat/BON
dovedl/ON
dovedu/BN
dovlat/BN
dovlekl/ON
dovybrat/ATXN
doznat/JTXN
dozrat/BN
dozat/ON
dozit/BTN
dra/XN
dupu/BN
dusny/YKRON
hlucny/YKRON
horky/YKRON
hrat/BTN
hudu/BN
chmurny/YKRON
chteje/XN
chte/XN
chvet/BN
jal/ON
jda/XN
jedu/BN
jemny/YKRON
jsa/XN
kapu/BN
kazan/ON
kazi/BN
klovu/BN
kousu/BN
kovu/BN
kratky/YKRON
lat/BN
lhal/ON
lha/XN
liby/YKRON
lkal/ON
lupu/BN
maje/XN
matl/ON
matu/BN
melky/YKRON
milostiv/ON
mlet/ON
mra/XN
mrazivy/YKRON
musil/ON
myt/BTN
nablit/BN
nabrat/ATXN
nabyl/ON
nadat/BN
nadejda/XN
nadeji/BN
nadel/ON
nadepisu/BN
nadjedu/BN
nadjel/ON
nadra/XN
nadupu/BN
nahlidnout/ATXN
nahrat/BTN
nachylit/ATXN
najal/ON
najda/XN
najdu/BN
najmu/BN
nakazan/ON
nakazi/BN
nalhan/ON
nalit/BN
namelu/BN
namozen/ON
napasl/ON
napisi/BN
napit/BN
naplel/ON
naplout/BN
napovezen/ON
narazit/ACXN
narubu/BN
narecen/ON
nasat/BON
nasil/ON
nasmat/BN
nastat/BN
nastojim/BN
nastoupit/ATXN
nasvetlen/ON
nasit/BTN
natra/XN
natresu/BN
navazi/BN
naveden/ON
naznat/JTXN
nazout/BTN
nazal/ON
naznu/BN
nerad/O
obehrat/BTN
obejda/XN
obejit/ON
obejmu/BN
obeplout/BTN
obeslal/ON
obestoupit/ATXN
obeslu/BN
obhlednout/ATXN
obhlidnout/ATXN
obit/BN
objal/ON
obkousu/BN
oblacny/YKRON
oblit/BN
obmenit/ATXN
obmyslen/ON
obout/BTN
obryt/BTN
obstaran/ON
obstoupit/ATXN
obsit/BTN
obvit/BN
odbudu/BN
odbyl/ON
oddra/XN
odebrat/ATXN
odedra/XN
odehrat/BTN
odejda/XN
odejedu/BN
odejel/ON
odejmu/BN
odemelu/BN
odemlet/ON
odepisu/BN
odepsal/ON
odespat/BTN
odestlal/ON
odestojim/BN
odestoupit/ATXN
odetnu/BN
odchylit/ATXN
odjedu/BN
odkazan/ON
odkazi/BN
odkryt/BTN
odmenit/ATXN
odnat/ON
odpit/BN
odra/XN
odrostl/ON
odrostu/BN
odreknuv/XN
odriznuty/YRON
odsat/BON
odstonal/ON
odstoupit/ATXN
odstunu/BN
odtresen/ON
odtresu/BN
odumra/XN
odvedu/BN
odvlekl/ON
ohrat/BTN
ojet/ION
oklovu/BN
omyt/BTN
oplozen/ON
opsan/ON
orazit/ACXN
oseji/BN
osil/ON
otra/XN
otresen/ON
otresu/BN
ovit/BN
ozabl/ON
ozrejmit/ATXN
ozehnout/ATXN
pasu/BN
patrn/O
pit/BN
pjat/ON
pln/ON
plovaje/XN
pobezim/BN
poblit/ON
pobrat/ATXN
pobudu/BN
podebrat/ATXN
podejda/XN
podejmu/BN
podel/ON
podeplout/BTN
podepsan/ON
podjat/ON
podlit/BN
podminen/ON
podstal/ON
podstojim/BN
podstoupit/ATXN
podvedl/ON
podvedu/BN
pochmurny/YKRON
pojda/XN
pojmu/BN
pokojen/ON
pokornet/AJTXN
pokovit/ATXN
pokvetu/BN
poloprazdny/YO
pomatu/BN
pomlel/ON
pomra/XN
pomylit/ATXN
poodejdu/BN
poodjel/ON
poodstoupit/ATXN
popasu/BN
popit/ON
popluji/BN
popojda/XN
popojet/ION
poposit/BTN
popsan/ON
porazit/ACXN
poryt/BTN
posel/ON
pospat/BN
postal/ON
postoupit/ATXN
postunu/BN
posel/ON
potece/BN
potra/XN
poucil/ON
poukazi/BN
povedl/ON
povedu/BN
povinovan/ON
povyrazit/ACXN
povyrostu/BN
pozapomnel/ON
pozmenit/ATXN
poznat/JTXN
pozat/ON
poznu/BN
problit/ON
probrat/ATXN
prodra/XN
produpu/BN
prohlednout/ATXN
prohlidnout/ATXN
prohnan/ON
prochvet/BN
projda/XN
projmul/ON
prokapu/BN
prokousu/BN
prolhal/ON
prolzu/BN
promenit/ATXN
pronajal/ON
propisi/BN
propit/ON
proplout/BTN
propsan/ON
prorazit/ACXN
prorekl/ON
proreknuv/XN
proseji/BN
proset/ON
prospet/BN
prostonal/ON
prostoupit/ATXN
protnu/BN
protnut/ON
protra/XN
proudil/ON
provat/BON
provlekl/ON
prozenu/BN
prebrat/ATXN
predehnal/ON
predehrat/BTN
predejda/XN
predejmul/ON
predemelu/BN
predepsal/ON
predestoupit/ATXN
predezenu/BN
predjel/ON
predrazit/ACXN
predsevzal/ON
predstoupit/ATXN
predupu/BN
predvybrat/ATXN
prehlidnout/ATXN
prehnal/ON
prehrat/BON
prechylit/ATXN
prejat/ON
prejda/XN
prekapu/BN
prekontrolovat/ATXN
prekryt/BTN
prelhan/ON
premenit/ATXN
premozen/ON
prepisi/BN
preposlal/ON
preposlu/BN
prerecen/ON
prereknuv/XN
presecu/BN
presekl/ON
prestal/ON
prestelu/BN
prestoupit/ATXN
pretal/ON
pretra/XN
pretresen/ON
pretresu/BN
prevezmu/BN
prevlekl/ON
prezit/BTN
pribrat/ATXN
pribyl/ON
prihrat/BTN
prijat/ON
prijda/XN
prikapu/BN
prilit/BN
prilit/ON
prioden/ON
pripisi/BN
pripomnel/ON
prirazit/ACXN
prirostl/ON
prirostu/BN
prisat/BON
prispat/BN
pristal/ON
pristoupit/ATXN
prisit/BTN
pritomen/ON
pritra/XN
privstat/BN
prizabit/ON
priznat/JTXN
pujcil/ON
razit/ACXN
rozbit/BN
rozbit/ON
rozedra/XN
rozehrat/BON
rozejda/XN
rozemlel/ON
rozepisi/BN
rozepsan/ON
rozespat/BTN
rozestlal/ON
rozestoupit/ATXN
rozetnu/BN
rozetra/XN
rozeznat/JTXN
rozhlednout/ATXN
rozhlidnout/ATXN
rozjedu/BN
rozkazan/ON
rozkousu/BN
rozlit/BN
rozmenit/ATXN
rozpomnel/ON
rozpoznat/JTXN
rozptylit/ATXN
rozryt/BTN
rozsecen/ON
rozsil/ON
rozstoupit/ATXN
rozsit/BTN
roztrasl/ON
roztresu/BN
rozvit/ON
rozzav/XN
rozzehnout/ATXN
rozznu/BN
rusny/YKRON
reknuv/XN
riznuty/YRON
rka/XN
sat/BON
sbit/ON
sebrat/ATXN
sedra/XN
sejda/XN
sejdu/BN
sejmut/ON
semelu/BN
semlel/ON
seriznuty/YRON
sesecu/BN
sestoupit/ATXN
sesel/ON
setnu/BN
setra/XN
seznat/JTXN
sezal/ON
sezehnout/ATXN
shnit/BN
schylit/ATXN
sjel/ON
skryt/BTN
slaby/YKRO
slizky/YKRO
smat/BN
smenit/ATXN
snadny/YKRON
spasen/ON
spat/BN
spoluprozit/BTN
spreden/ON
srazit/ACXN
stal/ON
stat/ON
stelu/BN
strasl/ON
superdlouhy/YRO
svat/BON
svlekl/ON
sikmy/YKRON
sit/BTN
tat/ON
teka/XN
tepu/BN
tezky/YKRO
tra/XN
tvrdy/YKRON
ubit/BN
ubrat/ATXN
ucil/ON
udim/BN
udra/XN
uhneten/ON
uhrat/BON
ujda/XN
ujel/ON
ukapu/BN
ukazan/ON
ukout/BTN
umelu/BN
umra/XN
upit/BN
upit/ON
urazit/ACXN
urecen/ON
ureknuv/XN
usebrat/ATXN
uspat/BTN
ustal/ON
ustojim/BN
ustoupit/ATXN
utal/ON
utra/XN
uvazi/BN
uveden/ON
uvit/ON
uznat/JTXN
uzrat/BN
valuta/ZXQ
vazky/YKRO
vazi/BN
veda/XN
vedom/ON
vejda/XN
vejdu/BN
vepsan/ON
vetnu/BN
vetra/XN
vetrny/YKRON
vida/XN
vidovat/ATXN
vit/BN
vjel/ON
vlit/BN
vlit/ON
vrazit/ACXN
vrostl/ON
vryt/BTN
vsat/ON
vstoupit/ATXN
vsit/BTN
vtat/ON
vybrat/ATXN
vydobudu/BN
vydobyl/ON
vydra/XN
vyhlednout/ATXN
vyhlidnout/ATXN
vyhrat/BTN
vychylit/ATXN
vyjda/XN
vyjel/ON
vyjmu/BN
vykazan/ON
vykousu/BN
vylit/BN
vymenit/ATXN
vymlel/ON
vymra/XN
vynajdu/BN
vynal/ON
vypasl/ON
vypisi/BN
vyplel/ON
vyplout/BN
vypsan/ON
vyrazit/ACXN
vyreknu/BN
vysat/ON
vyset/ON
vysmat/BN
vysoky/YKRON
vystojim/BN
vystonal/ON
vystoupit/ATXN
vyslu/BN
vytat/ON
vytnu/BN
vytra/XN
vyvazi/BN
vyvedl/ON
vyznat/JTXN
vyzrat/BN
vyzat/ON
vzdout/BTN
vzejda/XN
vzepjal/ON
vzpomnel/ON
vzrostu/BN
zabrat/ATXN
zacasty/YON
zadout/BTN
zadra/XN
zahlidnout/ATXN
zahrat/BON
zahudl/ON
zajda/XN
zajdu/BN
zajel/ON
zakazi/BN
zaklet/ON
zalzu/BN
zamenit/ATXN
zamlel/ON
zapisi/BN
zapit/ON
zaposit/BTN
zapovezen/ON
zapujcil/ON
zarazit/ACXN
zareknu/BN
zasel/ON
zasout/BTN
zastlal/ON
zastoupit/ATXN
zastunu/BN
zatat/ON
zatnu/BN
zatra/XN
zaujal/ON
zavazi/BN
zavit/ON
zavrzu/BN
zazal/ON
zazehnout/ATXN
zazit/BTN
zblit/BN
zbyl/ON
zdupu/BN
zebu/BN
zemra/XN
zesilazovat/ATXN
zhlidnout/ATXN
zkontrolovat/ATXN
zkovu/BN
zlit/ON
zmenit/ATXN
zmylit/ATXN
zmyslen/ON
zneuzit/BTN
zout/BTN
zpokornet/AJTXN
zrubu/BN
zrecen/ON
zreknuv/XN
zustat/BN
zvan/ON
zat/ON
zenu/BN
